Utah statutes.
10-3-1105.   Municipal employees -- Duration and termination of employment -- Exceptions.

(1)  Except as provided in Subsection (2), each employee of a municipality shall hold employment without limitation of time, being subject to discharge, suspension of over two days without pay, or involuntary transfer to a position with less remuneration only as provided in Section 10-3-1106.

(2)  Subsection (1) does not apply to:

(a)  an officer appointed by the mayor or other person or body exercising executive power in the municipality;

(b)  a member of the municipality's police department or fire department who is a member of the classified civil service in a first or second class city;

(c)  a police chief of the municipality;

(d)  a deputy police chief of the municipality;

(e)  a fire chief of the municipality;

(f)  a deputy or assistant fire chief of the municipality;

(g)  a head of a municipal department;

(h)  a deputy of a head of a municipal department;

(i)  a superintendent;

(j)  a probationary employee of the municipality;

(k)  a part-time employee of the municipality; or

(l)  a seasonal employee of the municipality.

(3)  Nothing in this section or Section 10-3-1106 may be construed to limit a municipality's ability to define cause for an employee termination or reduction in force.

